dictsource/io_rules
// ***************************************************************************
// *   Copyright (C) 2020 by José Miguel López (LaMashino)                   *
// *   email: lamashino <at> hotmail <dot> com                                    *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/

// Translation rules for Ido
// Version 1.0: 8-8-2020

// This file is UTF-8 encoded


.group a
     _) a (_       a
	    ar (_      'aR  // Infinitives are stressed on the last syllable
        a          a
        au         aU  // laute: "u" sound must be shorter and quicker



.group b
     _) b (_       be   // In Ido, the name of a letter is the letter plus vowel "e"
        b          b

.group c
     _) c (_       tse
     _) ch (_      tSe       
        c          ts
        ch         tS 


.group d
     _) d (_       de
        d          d

.group e
     _) e (_       e
        e          e
        eu         eU // Europa, "u" sound should be shorter and quicker

.group f
     _) f (_       fe
        f          f

.group g
     _) g (_       ge
        g          g

.group h
     _) h (_       he
        h          h

.group i
     _) i (_       i
        i          i
        ir (_      'iR  // Infinitives are stressed on the last syllable
		ia (_      =ia  // En plursilaba radiki, i e u nemediate avan vokalo ne darfas recevas l'acento,
		ia (C_     =ia  // ma en la prelasta silabo
		ie (_      =ie
		ie (C_     =ie
		ii (_      =ii
		ii (C_     =ii
		io (_      =io
		io (C_     =io
		

.group j
     _) j (_       dZe
        j          dZ

.group k
     _) k (_       ke
        k          k


.group l
     _) l (_       le
        l          l

.group m
     _) m (_       me
        m          m

.group n
     _) n (_       ne
        n          n


.group o
     _) o (_       o
        o          o
        or (_      'oR  // Infinitives are stressed on the last syllable


.group p
     _) p (_       pe
        p          p

.group q
     _) q (_       kwe
        q          k
        qu         ku

.group r
     _) r (_       Re
        r          R

.group s
     _) s (_       se
     _) sh (_      Se
        s          s
        sh         S         

.group t
     _) t (_       te
        t          t

.group u
     _) u (_       u
        u          u
		ua (_      =ua  // En plursilaba radiki, i e u nemediate avan vokalo ne darfas recevas l'acento,
		ua (C_     =ua  // ma en la prelasta silabo
		ue (_      =ue
		ue (C_     =ue
		ui (_      =ui
		ui (C_     =ui
		uo (_      =uo
		uo (C_     =uo

.group v
     _) v (_       ve
        v          v

.group w
     _) w (_       we
        w          w

.group x
     _) x (_       kse
        x          ks

.group y
     _) y (_       je
        y          j


.group z
     _) z (_       ze
        z          z
